Florida, session 2026, HB973.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 1003.457, Florida
Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (5), subsection (1) is
amended, and a new subsection (4) is added to that section, to
read:
1003.457 Cardiac emergencies, and automated external
defibrillators, and bleeding control kits on school grounds.—
(1) Each public school shall develop a plan for urgent
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb973-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 973 2026
life-saving emergencies (PULSE) that addresses the appropriate
use of school personnel to respond to incidents involving an
individual experiencing sudden cardiac arrest, severe bleeding,
or a similar life-threatening emergency while on school grounds.
Each PULSE must integrate evidence-based core elements and
consider those elements recommended by the American Heart
Association for schools responding to cardiac emergencies.
(4)(a) No later than July 1, 2028, each public school,
including charter schools, must have bleeding control kits on
school grounds. Each bleeding control kit must be available in a
clearly marked and publicized location. Schools must maintain
the bleeding control kits according to the manufacturer's
recommendations. The Department of Education shall establish
guidelines for determining the number of bleeding control kits
each school is required to have pursuant to this subsection.
(b) Appropriate staff, as determined by the department,
must receive training in the use of bleeding control kits.
(c) Bleeding control kits and the use of such kits must be
integrated into the appropriate emergency drills under s.
1006.07(4).
(d) Upon the use of a bleeding control kit, the kit must
be restocked and used items must be replaced.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb973-00